Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the geologist licensing board.

(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Engineering geologist" means a geologist who, by reason of his or her knowledge of engineering geology, acquired by education and practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of engineering geology, has met the qualifications in engineering geology established under this chapter, and has been issued a license in engineering geology by the board.

(5) "Engineering geology" means a specialty of geology affecting the planning, design, operation, and maintenance of engineering works and other human activities where geological factors and conditions impact the public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment.

(6) "Geologist" means a person who, by reason of his or her knowledge of geology, mathematics, the environment, and the supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by education and practical experience, has met the qualifications established under this chapter, and has been issued a certificate of licensing as a geologist by the board.

(7) "Geology" means the science that includes: Treatment of the earth and its origin and history, in general; the investigation of the earth's constituent rocks, minerals, solids, fluids, including surface and underground waters, gases, and other materials; and the study of the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause changes in the earth.

(8) "Hydrogeology" means a science that involves the study of the waters of the earth, including the study of the occurrence, circulation, distribution, chemistry, remediation, or quality of water or its role as a natural agent that causes changes in the earth, and the investigation and collection of data concerning waters in the atmosphere or on the surface or in the interior of the earth, including data regarding the interaction of water with other gases, solids, or fluids.

(9) "Licensed specialty geologist" means a licensed geologist who has met the qualifications in a specialty of geology established under this chapter and has been issued a license in that specialty by the board.

(10) "Practice of engineering geology" means performance of geological service or work including but not limited to consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, geological mapping, and inspection of geological work, and the responsible supervision thereof, the performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter, and includes but is not limited to the commonly recognized geological practices of construction geology, environmental geology, and urban geology.

(11) "Practice of geology" means performance of geological service or work including but not limited to collection of geological data, consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpreting, planning, geological mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work that applies to geology, and the responsible supervision thereof, the performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter.

(12) "Practice of geology for others" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The preparation of geologic reports, documents, or exhibits by any commission, board, department, district, or division of the state or any political subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission, board, department, district, or division of the state or any political subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other public body when the reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available to the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be expected to rely thereon or be affected thereby; and

(b) The performance of geological services by any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other association or by the employees or staff members thereof, whether or not the principal business of the organization is the practice of geology, which the geological reports, documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of geology are disseminated or made available to the public or any individual or organization in such a manner that the public or individual or combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to rely thereon or be affected thereby.

However, geological reports, documents, or exhibits that are prepared by the employees or staff members of any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other association or commission, board, department, district, or division of the state or any political subdivision thereof or any county, city, or other public body that are for use solely within such organizations are considered in-house reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of geology for others unless or until the reports are disseminated or made available as set forth in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(13) "Practice of hydrogeology" means the performance of or offer to perform any hydrogeologic service or work in which the public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, environment, or property is concerned or involved. This includes the collection of geological data, and consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation, planning, or inspection relating to a service or work that applies hydrogeology.

(14) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent control and direction of geological work or the supervision of such work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable for the results.

(15) "Specialty" means a branch of geology that has been recognized under this chapter for the purposes of licensure. Engineering geology is considered to be a specialty of geology.

(16) "Subordinate" means any person who assists in the practice of geology by a licensed geologist or an exempt person, without assuming the responsible charge of the work.

[ 2000 c 253 s 3.]